North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 11. Eminent Domain.

§ 160A-240.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 919, s. 28.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to eminent domain, see Chapter 40A.

§ 160A-240.1.
Power to acquire property.

A city may acquire, by gift, grant, devise, exchange, purchase, lease, or any other lawful method, the fee or any lesser interest in real or personal property for use by the city or any department, board, commission or agency of the city. In exercising the power of eminent domain a city shall use the procedures of Chapter 40A.

History.

1981, c. 919, s. 29; 1983, c. 768, s. 23; 2011-284, s. 112.

Local Modification.

City of Monroe: 1985, c. 177; 2000-35, s. 1; city of Rocky Mount: 2003-327, s. 1; city of Wilson: 1989, c. 348, s. 1; town of Cary: 1993, c. 137, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to counties in which the consent of the board of commissioners is required before land may be condemned or acquired by a local governmental unit outside the county, see

G.S. 153A-15

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 112, effective June 24, 2011, deleted “bequest” following “devise” in the first sentence.

§§ 160A-241 through 160A-261.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 919, s. 28.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to eminent domain, see Chapter 40A.

§ 160A-262.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 426, s. 42.

§ 160A-263.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 919, s. 28.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to eminent domain, see Chapter 40A.

§ 160A-264.

Reserved for future codification purposes.